Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 4. Establishment of Support Order or Determination of Parentage.

Sec. 25.25.401.
Establishment of support order.

If a support order entitled to recognition under this chapter has not been issued, a responding tribunal of this state with personal jurisdiction over the parties may issue a support order if

the individual seeking the order resides outside this state; or

the support enforcement agency seeking the order is located outside this state.

The tribunal may issue a temporary child support order if the tribunal determines that an order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay is

a presumed father of the child;

petitioning to have the individual’s paternity adjudicated;

identified as the father of the child through genetic testing;

an alleged father who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child;

an acknowledged father under AS

25.20.050

;

the mother of the child; or

an individual who has been ordered to pay child support in a previous proceeding and the order has not been reversed or vacated.

[Repealed, § 32 ch 102 SLA 2015.]

If, after providing an obligor with notice and opportunity to be heard, an appropriate tribunal finds that the obligor owes a duty of support, the tribunal shall issue a support order directed to the obligor and may issue other orders under AS

25.25.305

.

Before issuing an order under (b) of this section, the child support services agency shall adopt regulations for issuing such an order.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 66, 67, 102 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in (e) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), in the introductory language, twice deleted “child” preceding “support order”, inserted “with personal jurisdiction over the parties” following “tribunal of this state”, made stylistic changes; rewrote (b), which read, “The tribunal may issue a temporary child support order if (1) the respondent has signed a verified statement acknowledging parentage; (2) the respondent has been determined under law to be the parent; or (3) there is other clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is the child’s parent.”; repealed (c).

Sec. 25.25.402.
Proceeding to determine parentage.

A tribunal of this state authorized to determine parentage of a child may serve as a responding tribunal in a proceeding to determine parentage of a child brought under this chapter or a law or procedure substantially similar to this chapter.

History.

(§ 68 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effective dates. —

Section 107, ch. 32, SLA 2015 makes this section effective July 1, 2015.